Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [116J.8739] MINNESOTA STRATEGIC INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT ENHANCEMENT ACT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible entity" means an entity incorporated and located in Minnesota with a qualifying project in a qualifying project location. new text end new text begin (d) "Project sponsor" means a local economic development organization, local economic development authority, or port authority, or an entity that owns a qualified industrial park or terminal, switching, or Class II or III railroad. new text end new text begin (e) "Project tax credit amount" means the amount of tax credits allocated by the commissioner to a qualifying project for qualified economic development and initial infrastructure expenditures. new text end new text begin (f) "Qualified economic development expenditure" means an expenditure for land improvements, building construction, building improvements and expansion, port terminal improvements, and the purchase of certain machinery and equipment. new text end new text begin (g) "Qualified initial infrastructure expenditure" means an expenditure for new rail infrastructure and improvements, which includes: the acquisition of right-of-way; engineering; construction of new track such as industrial leads, switches, spurs, and sidings; loading dock improvements; and transloading structures involved with providing rail service to a qualifying project. new text end new text begin (h) "Qualifying project" means the new construction or expansion of an eligible entity or the development of qualified initial infrastructure to serve an eligible entity in a qualifying project location. new text end new text begin (i) "Qualifying project location" means a project located in an industrial park, economic development zone, opportunity zone, or port located within a county in Minnesota with a population of less than 250,000 or a project located adjacent to a terminal, switching, or Class II or III railroad as defined by the federal Surface Transportation Board. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Credits allowed; limitation; carryover. new text end new text begin (a) An eligible entity is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under chapter 290 equal to 10 percent of qualified economic development expenditures, not to exceed $8,000,000 per qualifying project. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible entity is allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to chapter 290 equal to 50 percent of qualified initial infrastructure expenditures, not to exceed $4,000,000 per qualifying project. new text end new text begin (c) A project sponsor must submit a project application for an allocation of tax credits under this section. The application must include a description of the qualifying project, project location, detailed project costs, and a summary of expected economic benefits and job creation. new text end new text begin (d) Projects are eligible to combine qualified economic development and qualified initial infrastructure expenditures, but the total project tax credit amount must not exceed $10,000,000 per qualifying project in aggregate. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner shall not allocate credits exceeding $50,000,000 in a tax year. Qualifying projects that have applied and are not allocated all or part of credit for qualified economic development expenditures or qualified initial infrastructure expenditures are eligible for credit in subsequent tax years. new text end new text begin (f) The tax credit under this section may not exceed an eligible entity's liability for tax. If the amount of the credit for any taxable year exceeds this limitation, the excess is a credit carryover to each of the five succeeding taxable years. The entire amount of the excess unused credit for the taxable year is carried first to the earliest of the taxable years to which the credit may be carried and then to each successive year to which the credit may be carried. The amount of the unused credit that may be added under this paragraph must not exceed the taxpayer's liability for tax, less the credit for the taxable year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program implementation. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall adopt rules to permit verification of the eligibility of a qualifying project for the purpose of claiming the credits. new text end new text begin (b) The rules shall provide for the approval of qualified economic development expenditures and qualified initial infrastructure expenditures prior to commencement of a project and provide a certificate of verification upon completion of a project that uses qualified economic development expenditures. The certificate of verification shall satisfy all requirements of the Department of Revenue pertaining to the eligibility of the eligible taxpayer claiming the credit. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Transferability; written agreement required; credit certificate. new text end new text begin (a) The credits allowed under this section may be assigned to any taxpayer subject to income tax in the state of Minnesota pursuant to chapter 290 by written agreement at any time during the taxable year in which the credit is earned by the eligible entity or in the subsequent years as allowed by subdivision 2, paragraph (f). new text end new text begin (b) The eligible taxpayer and the assignee must jointly file a copy of the written assignment agreement with the Department of Revenue within 30 days of the assignment. The written agreement must contain the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the parties to the assignment, the tax year the eligible taxpayer incurred the qualified expenditures, the amount of credit being assigned, and the tax year or years for which the credit may be claimed. new text end new text begin (c) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules, forms, and regulations as necessary to implement and administer this section and certify the tax credit amount generated by each qualifying project annually. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Sunset. new text end new text begin This section expires January 1, 2035, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2034. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end